test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-h8_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    land+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: land
    land+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: land
    land+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: landi
    land+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: lands
    land+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: lond
    land+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: lond
    land+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: londum
    land+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: landa
    land+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: landið
    land+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: landið
    land+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: landinum
    land+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: landsins
    land+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: londini
    land+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: londini
    land+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: londunum
    land+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: landanna
